Utah statutes.
31A-37a-301.   Formation.
(1)  A special purpose financial captive insurance company may be:
(a)  incorporated as a stock insurer with its capital divided into shares and
held by its stockholders; or
(b)  organized as a manager-managed limited liability company.
(2)  A special purpose financial captive insurance company's organizational
documents shall limit the special purpose financial captive insurance
company's authority to transact the business of insurance or reinsurance to
those activities that the special purpose financial captive insurance company
conducts to accomplish its purposes as expressed in this chapter.
